Virginia statutes. Title 46.2. Motor Vehicles.
Chapter 8.
Regulation of Traffic.

Article 18.

Arrest of Nonresidents.

46.2-944.Definitions.

46.2-945.Issuance of citation to motorist; party jurisdiction; police officer to report noncompliance with citation.

46.2-946.Department to transmit officer's report to party jurisdiction; suspension of resident's license for noncompliance with citation issued by party jurisdiction.